District of Columbia statutes.
31-2231.24

Judicial review.

If, after any hearing under § 31-2231.23, the Commissioner does not find a violation of this chapter, an aggrieved person may, within 60 days after the decision has been issued, or later in connection with § 31-2231.11(a), (b), or (b-1) upon a showing of good cause by a victim of an intrafamily offense, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking, appeal the decision of the Commissioner to the District of Columbia Court of Appeals. In addition, any person subject to an order of the Commissioner under § 31-2231.22 may obtain a review of the order by filing in the District of Columbia Court of Appeals, within 60 days after the order has been issued, a written petition requesting that the order of the Commissioner be set aside. Except as provided above for the time for filing an appeal, appeals shall be made in accordance with § 2-510.

History

Apr. 3, 2001, D.C. Law 13-265, § 124, 48 DCR 1225
Apr. 8, 2011, D.C. Law 18-360, § 202(b), 58 DCR 896

Effect of Amendments

D.C. Law 18-360 substituted “issued, or later in connection with § 31-2231.11(a), (b), or (b-1) upon a showing of good cause by a victim of an intrafamily offense, sexual assault, dating violence, or stalking, appeal” for “issued, appeal”.

Editor's Notes

Section 203 of D.C. Law 18-360 provided: “Sec. 203. Application. This title shall apply to policies and certificates of insurance that are health benefit plans as defined under section 2(4) of the Health Insurance Coverage for Habilitative Services for Children Act of 2006, effective March 2, 2007 (D.C. Law 16-198; D.C. Official Code § 31-3271(4)), that are issued 90 days after the effective date of this title. This title shall not apply to short-term limited duration health benefit plans.”